District of Columbia statutes.
29-204.02

Plan of conversion.

(a)

A domestic entity may convert to a different type of entity under this subchapter by approving a plan of conversion. The plan shall be in a record and contain:

(1)

The name and type of the converting entity;

(2)

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

(3)

The manner of converting the interests in the converting entity into interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, money, or other property, or any combination of the foregoing;

(4)

The proposed public organic record of the converted entity if it will be a filing entity;

(5)

The full text of the private organic rules of the converted entity that are proposed to be in a record;

(6)

The other terms and conditions of the conversion; and

(7)

Any other provision required by the law of the District or the organic rules of the converting entity.

(b)

A plan of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(b)(18), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “formation, and type of entity” for “organization and type” in (a)(2); substituted “money” for “cash” in (a)(3); and substituted “record” for “document” in (a)(4).
This section is referenced in § 29-201.02 and § 29-1001.09.